Massachusetts, session 194th, S1161.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 52 of chapter 55 of the acts of 2020 is hereby amended by striking
clause (iii) and inserting in place thereof the following:- (iii) inform people eligible to have their
records expunged as a result of changes to criminal laws resulting from marijuana
decriminalization and legalization.
SECTION 2. Section 59 of chapter 55 of the acts of 2020 is hereby repealed.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, a person having
a record of criminal court appearance or disposition on file with the office of the commissioner
of probation for a charge of unlawful possession of a controlled substance under section 34 of
chapter 94C of the General Laws shall be eligible to have the record and related records, if any,
expunged immediately under section 7 of chapter 258D of the General Laws if the controlled
of 2

substance specified in the complaint related to the court appearance or disposition was marijuana
under clause (1) of subsection (b) of Class D of section 31 of said chapter 94C.
of 2